Maine, session 132, LD875.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Purchased Social Services 0228
Initiative: Provides funding for essential services for victims of domestic violence.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $4,000,000 $4,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $4,000,000 $4,000,000
2128 Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
2139 takes effect when approved.